src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-k16_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    blettur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: blettur
    blettur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: blett
    blettur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: bletti
    blettur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: blets
    blettur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: blettir
    blettur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: blettir
    blettur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: blettum
    blettur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: bletta
    blettur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: bletturin
    blettur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: blettin
    blettur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: blettinum
    blettur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: bletsins
    blettur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: blettirnir
    blettur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: blettirnar
    blettur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: blettunum
    blettur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: blettanna
